Alabama, session 2026rs, HB428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
27 Section 1. (a) No person may inject, store, or
28 sequester carbon dioxide in an underground well, including a
Page 1

sequester carbon dioxide in an underground well, including a
HB428 INTRODUCED
29 Class VI well as defined by the United States Environmental
30 Protection Agency pursuant to the Underground Injection
31 Control Program of the Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. §
32 300f et seq., unless the governing body of the county, and the
33 governing body of the municipality, if applicable, in which
34 the well will be located has approved of the well.
35 (b) Any person seeking approval from the governing body
36 of a county or municipality for the siting of a new well shall
37 submit all of the following to the governing body as its
38 application:
39 (1) An application fee in an amount of fifty thousand
40 dollars ($50,000) payable to the local governing body.
41 (2) A written document addressing each of the criteria
42 described in subsection (e).
43 (2) The applicant's experience of owning or operating
44 such wells.
45 (3) Information relating to the applicant's financial
46 resources, including any investors or corporate affiliates of
47 the applicant.
48 (4) Any pending and past civil or criminal actions
49 taken by a governmental entity against the applicant or its
50 owners, operators, investors, or affiliates.
51 (5) Any other information the applicant deems relevant
52 or that may assist the local governing body in making a
53 decision whether to approve or disapprove the application.
54 (c) After an applicant has submitted a complete
55 application to the local governing body, the body shall
56 formally receive the application at its next regularly
Page 2

formally receive the application at its next regularly
HB428 INTRODUCED
57 scheduled meeting. At this time, the public comment period
58 begins.
59 (d)(1) Not more than 10 days after the formal receipt
60 of an application, the local governing body, at the expense of
61 the applicant, shall provide the following notice that an
62 application for local approval of a new well has been
63 received:
64 a. Notice to each owner whose property is adjacent to a
65 proposed well site, sent by certified mail.
66 b. Notice to the general public provided by all of the
67 following means:
68 1. Publishing a notice in a newspaper having general
69 circulation, if one exists, within the affected community one
70 day per week for a two-week period.
71 2. Broadcasting public service announcements submitted
72 to a radio station that has general broadcast coverage within
73 the affected community.
74 3. Displaying a notice on the local governing body's
75 website, if available.
76 (2) Any printed notice by letter, newspaper, or
77 electronically on a website shall contain at a minimum the
78 following:
79 a. A description of the application and approval
80 process as provided in this section.
81 b. A description of the criteria the governing body
82 will consider, as provided in subsection (e), in determining
83 whether to approve or disapprove the site.
84 c. An individual who interested persons may contact to
Page 3

c. An individual who interested persons may contact to
HB428 INTRODUCED
85 obtain additional information and review copies of the
86 application.
87 d. A description of the location where interested
88 persons may obtain or review copies of the application, and
89 the time frame for public hearings and involvement.
90 e. A description of how the public may submit written
91 comments to the local governing body.
92 (e) In determining whether to approve a new well, the
93 local governing body shall consider each of the following
94 criteria:
95 (1) The relationship of the proposed well to any local
96 planned or existing development, to major transportation
97 arteries, and to existing state primary and secondary roads.
98 (2) The location of a proposed well in relationship to
99 existing industries in the state that generate large volumes
100 of carbon dioxide, or the relationship to the areas projected
101 for development of industries that will generate carbon
102 dioxide.
103 (3) Costs and availability of public services,
104 facilities, and improvements required to support the proposed
105 well.
106 (4) The impact of the proposed well on public health,
107 safety, and the environment, including sources of drinking
108 water.
109 (5) The social and economic impacts of the proposed
110 well on the affected community, including changes in property
111 values and social or community perception.
112 (f)(1) Not more than 45 days after the local governing
Page 4

(f)(1) Not more than 45 days after the local governing
HB428 INTRODUCED
113 body formally receives an application, the applicant shall
114 conduct at least one public awareness session in the county or
115 municipality in which the proposed well is to be located,
116 during which the applicant shall provide general information
117 on the design and operation of the proposed well and address
118 questions and concerns voiced by members of the affected
119 community. The time, date, and location of the public
120 awareness session shall be approved by the local governing
121 body. The applicant, at its own expense, shall provide notice
122 of the public awareness session by both printed and broadcast
123 media beginning at least 30 days before the session. Printed
124 notification shall include publication in at least one
125 newspaper having general circulation within the affected
126 community one day per week for a two-week period. Broadcast
127 notification shall include public service announcements on a
128 radio station that has general broadcast coverage within the
129 affected community. At least one representative of the local
130 governing body shall attend each public awareness session. If
131 any written comment or question relating to the proposed well
132 is submitted to the applicant at the public awareness session,
133 the applicant shall respond, if practicable, in writing within
134 14 days to the member of the public with a copy provided to
135 the local governing body.
136 (2) The applicant is solely responsible for carrying
137 out the requirements of subdivision (1). A public awareness
138 session is independent of and separate from a public hearing.
139 (g) Not more than 45 days after the date of the last
140 public awareness session, the local governing body shall hold
Page 5

public awareness session, the local governing body shall hold
HB428 INTRODUCED
141 at least one public hearing. Notice of the time and place of
142 any public hearing shall be given by publication in at least
143 one newspaper of general circulation within the affected
144 community at least 30 days, but not more than 45 days, before
145 the proposed date of the hearing. Content of the notice shall
146 be consistent with the notice requirements in subsection (d).
147 All pertinent documents shall be available for inspection
148 during normal business hours at a location readily accessible
149 to the public. The public may submit written comments to the
150 local governing body at any time up to the conclusion of the
151 last public hearing.
152 (h) The local governing body shall have 30 days after
153 the last public hearing to complete its review of the
154 application and, giving consideration to the criteria provided
155 in subsection (e), to public input, and to other information
156 gathered from the applicant pursuant to subsection (b), shall
157 make a decision to approve or disapprove the siting of a new
158 well.
159 (i) If disapproved by the governing body, the applicant
160 may submit a new application under subsection (b). A new
161 application for local approval submitted within 18 months of
162 an application being disapproved by the local governing body
163 shall be accompanied by an application fee payable to the
164 local governing body in an amount equal to seventy-five
165 thousand dollars ($75,000).
166 (j) After the local governing body has granted approval
167 of the application, the applicant shall petition the
168 appropriate circuit court pursuant to Rule 57 of the Alabama
Page 6

appropriate circuit court pursuant to Rule 57 of the Alabama
HB428 INTRODUCED
169 Rules of Civil Procedure for a determination of each of the
170 following:
171 (1) Whether the local governing body complied with the
172 public comment requirements and time frames required under
173 this section.
174 (2) Whether the local governing body considered the
175 criteria provided in subsection (e) as presented to the body
176 by the applicant in its application pursuant to subsection
177 (b).
178 (k) The applicant shall bear all court costs, and his
179 or her own legal expenses, relating to the filing of the
180 petition.
181 (l) Unless the court with which a petition is filed
182 needs additional information from the local governing body,
183 the court shall issue a ruling not more than 60 days after the
184 initial petition is filed, provided the court may extend this
185 date not more than 30 additional days if the court seeks
186 additional information from the governing body.
187 (m) If the circuit court issues a declaratory judgment
188 determining that the local governing body met the criteria set
189 out in subsection (j), the applicant may seek approval by
190 other regulatory authorities as required by law. If the
191 circuit court issues a declaratory judgment determining that
192 the criteria set out in subsection (j) has not been met, the
193 matter shall be remanded to the local governing body for
194 further consideration consistent with the requirements of this
195 section. The local governing body or applicant shall be
196 afforded the opportunity to mitigate any discrepancies the
Page 7

afforded the opportunity to mitigate any discrepancies the
HB428 INTRODUCED
197 court finds, provided the period during which the governing
198 body or applicant shall respond may not extend more than 90
199 days.
200 Section 2. (a) Any well approved pursuant to Section 1
201 shall be taxed at a rate of ten percent of the gross value of
202 all carbon dioxide injected or otherwise stored in the well to
203 be remitted monthly to the Department of Revenue. For purposes
204 of this subsection, the term "gross value" means the sale
205 price or market value at the time of injection or storage.
206 (b) Fifty percent of the net amount of all taxes
207 collected by the department pursuant to subsection (a) shall
208 be deposited into the General Fund of the state. The other
209 fifty percent shall be allocated and distributed by the
210 Comptroller to the county in which the carbon dioxide was
211 injected or otherwise stored for local purposes or to be
212 expended at the discretion of the governing body. Fifty
213 percent of the fifty percent to be distributed to the county
214 shall be distributed to a municipality if the well is located
215 within the corporate limits of the municipality to be used for
216 the same purposes.
217 (c) The department may adopt rules to administer this
218 section.
219 Section 3. Section 1 of this act shall become effective
220 immediately and Section 2 of this act shall become effective
221 on October 1, 2026.
Page 8